Hawaii, session 2026, GM1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, in the event of a
natural disaster in Hawaii, federal military facilities located
throughout the State may serve as critical lifelines to protect
the public's health, safety, and welfare. These facilities
frequently provide essential support to disaster response and
recovery efforts, including logistics, transportation,
communications, and emergency shelter.
The legislature further finds that maintaining federal
military facilities in fully functional operating condition
provides significant benefits not only to the federal
government, but also to the people of the State of Hawaii.
Ensuring that these facilities remain reliable and capable of
supporting disaster response efforts directly promotes public
safety and contributes to the resilience of the State during
times of emergency.
However, the legislature finds that certain federal
military facilities in the State are currently in need of timely
2026-2397 SB3156 GDI SMA.docx
iniillllllllllEIIIHIIIIKItIjl

Page 2 3156
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
improvement work that the federal government, for a variety of
reasons, is currently unable to obtain or otherwise provide in a
timely manner and that the State may be able to assist with in a
specific and limited role. The legislature finds that, in
accordance with and subject to the terms and conditions set
forth in this Act, it is in the public's interest for the State,
through its department of transportation, to assist the federal
government with procuring construction services at federal
military installations.
The legislature finds and declares the following:
(1) The State, due to its geographic isolation, is
uniquely vulnerable to natural disasters, including
hurricanes and tsunamis;
(2) In the event of a major disaster, the State relies on
a network of public, including both state and federal,
and private resources for emergency response and
recovery efforts;
(3) Federal military installations located throughout the
State, including airfields, harbors, and highways, are
an integral part of this network and possess resources
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
ilVMiBiBiiiiiiiniiiiiniiHiii

Pages
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
critical to disaster response, including logistics,
transportation, communication, and emergency shelter;
(4) The operational readiness and sound physical condition
of these federal military installations are essential
for the timely and effective response to protect the
public's health, safety, and welfare;
(5) Cooperation between the State and federal government
to ensure the construction, maintenance, repair, and
functioning of this federal infrastructure is
therefore in the public interest of the State;
(6) The State possesses personnel and resources that can
be efficiently utilized for construction, maintenance,
and repair services on federal military facilities;
(7) Providing these services utilizing funds provided to
the State by the federal government ensures that the
State's actions are undertaken for a public purpose,
and that the financial burden does not fall on the
State's taxpayers; and
(8) This authorization for the State to provide these
services with the federal government funding such
services in advance serves a public purpose, enhancing
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiioniiMiDiiiniinii

Page 4 S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
the State's capacity to respond effectively to
emergencies while strengthening the partnership
between the State and the federal government in
safeguarding the welfare of the State's people.
The purpose of this Act is to establish authority for the
department of transportation to enter into agreements with the
United States Department of Defense to allow the department of
transportation to assist with the provision of any department
services, including construction, maintenance, improvement,
relocation, or extension service for federal military
installations.
SECTION 2. Chapter 261, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§261- Limited agreements for services on federal
military installations. (a) Subject to this section, the
department may enter into an agreement with the United States
Department of Defense to allow the department to assist with the
provision of any department service, including road maintenance,
improvement, relocation, or extension service, for military
installations.
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
■iiiiUiniiiiiiiiiinMOM

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) State funds shall not be used to provide the services
under an agreement entered into under this section. Federal
funds shall be the direct source of funds for payment for any
contract procured for these services.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the department shall
not enter into an agreement under this section if payment for
the services provided under the agreement would be made from
funds provided to the State for public roads under title 23
United States Code.
(d) The department may charge the United States Department
of Defense a fee for the administrative services of the
department relating to an agreement under this section, which
fee shall be determined based upon the time spent by department
staff procuring the subject work.”
SECTION 3. Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§264- Limited agreements for services on federal
military installations. (a) Subject to this section, the
department of transportation may enter into an agreement with
the United States Department of Defense to allow the department
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiniiiiiiimmiiio

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of transportation to assist with the provision of any department
service, including road maintenance, improvement, relocation, or
extension service for military installations.
(b) State funds shall not be used to provide the services
under an agreement entered into under this section. Federal
funds shall be the direct source of funds for payment for any
contract procured for these services.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the department of
transportation shall not enter into an agreement under this
section if payment for the services provided under the agreement
would be made from funds provided to the State for public roads
under title 23 United States Code.
(d) The department of transportation may charge the United
States Department of Defense a fee for the administrative
services of the department of transportation relating to an
agreement under this section, which fee shall be determined
based upon the time spent by department of transportation staff
procuring the subject work."
SECTION 4. Chapter 266, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
MiiiiiniiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 7
S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
"§266- Iiixnited agreements for services on federal
military installations. (a) Subject to this section, the
department of transportation may enter into an agreement with
the United States Department of Defense to allow the department
of transportation to assist with the provision of any department
service, including road maintenance, improvement, relocation, or
extension service, for military installations.
(b) State funds shall not be used to provide the services
under an agreement entered into under this section. Federal
funds shall be the direct source of funds for payment for any
contract procured for these services.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the department of
transportation shall not enter into an agreement under this
section if payment for the services provided under the agreement
would be made from funds provided to the State for public roads
under title 23 United States Code.
(d) The department of transportation may charge the United
States Department of Defense a fee for the administrative
services of the department of transportation relating to an
agreement under this section, which fee shall be determined
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx
MiiiHiniiiiiiiin

Page 8 3156
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
based upon the time spent by department of transportation staff
procuring the subject work."
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2397 SB3156 CDl SMA.docx 8

S.B. NO.
CD. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3156, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW AFI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
61-26

SB No. 3156, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives